Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-825
Act, how cited.

Sections
76-825 to 76-894 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Condominium
Act.

Laws 1983, LB 433, § 1;

Laws 1984, LB 1105, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 478, § 12;

Laws 2013, LB442, § 2.